Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4310.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 256B.4914, subdivision 5a, is amended to read: Subd. 5a. Base wage index; calculations. The base wage index must be calculated as follows: (1) for supervisory staff, 100 percent of the median wage for community and social services specialist (SOC code 21-1099), with the exception of the supervisor of positive supports professional, positive supports analyst, and positive supports specialist, which is 100 percent of the median wage for clinical counseling and school psychologist (SOC code 19-3031); (2) for registered nurse staff, 100 percent of the median wage for registered nurses (SOC code 29-1141); (3) for licensed practical nurse staff, 100 percent of the median wage for licensed practical nurses (SOC code 29-2061); (4)new text begin effective until the effective date of clause (5),new text end for residential asleep-overnight staff, the minimum wage in Minnesota for large employers; new text begin (5) effective January 1, 2027, or upon federal approval, whichever is later, for residential asleep-overnight staff, the minimum wage for Minnesota for large employers, except for asleep-overnight staff for family residential services, which is 36 percent of the minimum wage in Minnesota for large employers; new text end deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end for residential direct care staff, the sum of: (i) 15 percent of the subtotal of 50 percent of the median wage for home health and personal care aide (SOC code 31-1120); 30 percent of the median wage for nursing assistant (SOC code 31-1131); and 20 percent of the median wage for social and human services aide (SOC code 21-1093); and (ii) 85 percent of the subtotal of 40 percent of the median wage for home health and personal care aide (SOC code 31-1120); 20 percent of the median wage for nursing assistant (SOC code 31-1131); 20 percent of the median wage for psychiatric technician (SOC code 29-2053); and 20 percent of the median wage for social and human services aide (SOC code 21-1093); deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (7)new text end for adult day services staff, 70 percent of the median wage for nursing assistant (SOC code 31-1131); and 30 percent of the median wage for home health and personal care aide (SOC code 31-1120); deleted text begin (7)deleted text end new text begin (8)new text end for day support services staff and prevocational services staff, 20 percent of the median wage for nursing assistant (SOC code 31-1131); 20 percent of the median wage for psychiatric technician (SOC code 29-2053); and 60 percent of the median wage for social and human services aide (SOC code 21-1093); deleted text begin (8)deleted text end new text begin (9)new text end for positive supports analyst staff, 100 percent of the median wage for substance abuse, behavioral disorder, and mental health counselor (SOC code 21-1018); deleted text begin (9)deleted text end new text begin (10)new text end for positive supports professional staff, 100 percent of the median wage for clinical counseling and school psychologist (SOC code 19-3031); deleted text begin (10)deleted text end new text begin (11)new text end for positive supports specialist staff, 100 percent of the median wage for psychiatric technicians (SOC code 29-2053); deleted text begin (11)deleted text end new text begin (12)new text end for individualized home supports with family training staff, 20 percent of the median wage for nursing aide (SOC code 31-1131); 30 percent of the median wage for community social service specialist (SOC code 21-1099); 40 percent of the median wage for social and human services aide (SOC code 21-1093); and ten percent of the median wage for psychiatric technician (SOC code 29-2053); deleted text begin (12)deleted text end new text begin (13)new text end for individualized home supports with training services staff, 40 percent of the median wage for community social service specialist (SOC code 21-1099); 50 percent of the median wage for social and human services aide (SOC code 21-1093); and ten percent of the median wage for psychiatric technician (SOC code 29-2053); deleted text begin (13)deleted text end new text begin (14)new text end for employment support services staff, 50 percent of the median wage for rehabilitation counselor (SOC code 21-1015); and 50 percent of the median wage for community and social services specialist (SOC code 21-1099); deleted text begin (14)deleted text end new text begin (15)new text end for employment exploration services staff, 50 percent of the median wage for education, guidance, school, and vocational counselor (SOC code 21-1012); and 50 percent of the median wage for community and social services specialist (SOC code 21-1099); deleted text begin (15)deleted text end new text begin (16)new text end for employment development services staff, 50 percent of the median wage for education, guidance, school, and vocational counselors (SOC code 21-1012); and 50 percent of the median wage for community and social services specialist (SOC code 21-1099); deleted text begin (16)deleted text end new text begin (17)new text end for individualized home support without training staff, 50 percent of the median wage for home health and personal care aide (SOC code 31-1120); and 50 percent of the median wage for nursing assistant (SOC code 31-1131); deleted text begin (17)deleted text end new text begin (18)new text end effective until the effective date of clauses deleted text begin (18) anddeleted text end (19)new text begin and (20)new text end , for night supervision staff, 40 percent of the median wage for home health and personal care aide (SOC code 31-1120); 20 percent of the median wage for nursing assistant (SOC code 31-1131); 20 percent of the median wage for psychiatric technician (SOC code 29-2053); and 20 percent of the median wage for social and human services aide (SOC code 21-1093); deleted text begin (18)deleted text end new text begin (19)new text end effective January 1, 2026, or upon federal approval, whichever is later, for awake night supervision staff, 40 percent of the median wage for home health and personal care aide (SOC code 31-1120); 20 percent of the median wage for nursing assistant (SOC code 31-1131); 20 of percent the median wage for psychiatric technician (SOC code 29-2053); and 20 percent of the median wage for social and human services aid (SOC code 21-1093); and deleted text begin (19)deleted text end new text begin (20)new text end effective January 1, 2026, or upon federal approval, whichever is later, for asleep night supervision staff, the minimum wage in Minnesota for large employers. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.4914, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Residential support services; generally. (a) For purposes of this section, residential support services includes 24-hour customized living services, community residential services, customized living services, and integrated community supports.new text begin This paragraph expires on the effective date of paragraph (b).new text end new text begin (b) Effective January 1, 2027, or upon federal approval, whichever is later, for purposes of this section, residential support services includes 24-hour customized living services, community residential services, customized living services, integrated community supports, and family residential services. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end A unit of service for residential support services is a day. Any portion of any calendar day, within allowable Medicaid rules, where an individual spends time in a residential setting is billable as a day. The number of days authorized for all individuals enrolling in residential support services must include every day that services start and end. deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end When the available shared staffing hours in a residential setting are insufficient to meet the needs of an individual who enrolled in residential support services after January 1, 2014, then individual staffing hours shall be used. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.4914, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6e. new text end new text begin Family residential services; component values and calculation of payment rates. new text end new text begin (a) Effective January 1, 2027, or upon federal approval, component values for family residential services are: new text end new text begin (1) competitive workforce factor: 6.7 percent; new text end new text begin (2) supervisory span of control ratio: 11 percent; new text end new text begin (3) employee vacation, sick, and training allowance ratio: 8.71 percent; new text end new text begin (4) employee-related cost ratio: 23.6 percent; new text end new text begin (5) general administrative support ratio: 3.3 percent; new text end new text begin (6) program-related expense ratio: 1.3 percent; and new text end new text begin (7) absence factor: 1.7 percent. new text end new text begin (b) Payments for family residential services must be calculated as follows: new text end new text begin (1) determine the number of shared direct staffing and individual direct staffing hours to meet a recipient's needs provided on site or through monitoring technology; new text end new text begin (2) determine the appropriate hourly staff wage rates derived by the commissioner as provided in subdivisions 5 and 5a; new text end new text begin (3) except for subdivision 5a, clauses (1) to (4), multiply the result of clause (2) by the product of one plus the competitive workforce factor; new text end new text begin (4) for a recipient requiring customization for deaf and hard-of-hearing language accessibility under subdivision 12, add the customization rate provided in subdivision 12 to the result of clause (3); new text end new text begin (5) multiply the number of shared direct staffing and individual direct staffing hours provided on site or through monitoring technology and nursing hours by the appropriate staff wages; new text end new text begin (6) multiply the number of shared direct staffing and individual direct staffing hours provided on site or through monitoring technology and nursing hours by the product of the supervisory span of control ratio and the appropriate supervisory staff wage in subdivision 5a, clause (1); new text end new text begin (7) combine the results of clauses (5) and (6), excluding any shared direct staffing and individual direct staffing hours provided through monitoring technology, and multiply the result by one plus the employee vacation, sick, and training allowance ratio. This is defined as the direct staffing cost; new text end new text begin (8) for employee-related expenses, multiply the direct staffing cost, excluding any shared and individual direct staffing hours provided through monitoring technology, by one plus the employee-related cost ratio; new text end new text begin (9) for client programming and supports, add $2,260.21 divided by 365. The commissioner shall update the amount in this clause as specified in subdivision 5b; new text end new text begin (10) for transportation, if provided, add $1,742.62 divided by 365, or $3,111.81 divided by 365 if customized for adapted transport, based on the resident with the highest assessed need. The commissioner shall update the amounts in this clause as specified in subdivision 5b; new text end new text begin (11) subtotal clauses (8) to (10) and the direct staffing cost of any shared direct staffing and individual direct staffing hours provided through monitoring technology that was excluded in clause (8); new text end new text begin (12) sum the standard general administrative support ratio, the program-related expense ratio, and the absence and utilization factor ratio; new text end new text begin (13) divide the result of clause (11) by one minus the result of clause (12). This is the total payment rate; and new text end new text begin (14) adjust the result of clause (13) by a factor to be determined by the commissioner to adjust for regional differences in the cost of providing services. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.4914, subdivision 19, is amended to read: Subd. 19. Payments for family residential and life sharing services. new text begin (a) new text end The commissioner shall establish rates for family residential services and life sharing services based on a person's assessed need, as described in the federally-approved waiver plans. Rates for life sharing services must be ten percent higher than the corresponding family residential services rate.new text begin This paragraph expires on the effective date of paragraph (b).new text end new text begin (b) Effective January 1, 2027, or upon federal approval, whichever is later, the commissioner shall establish rates for life sharing services based on a person's assessed need, as described in the federally approved waiver plans. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end